Connecticut, session 2026, SB00043.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-217o of the general statutes be amended to replace the
current tax credit for machinery and equipment with a tax credit for fifty
per cent of the amount spent by a corporation, regardless of the number
of employees, on machinery and equipment acquired for and installed
in a facility in this state, provided such machinery or equipment is used
in such facility for a minimum of five years after installation and
provided further the full amount of the tax credit shall be repaid by the
corporation if the five-year minimum use is not met.